North Dakota, session 69, SB2060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 61-16.2-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
61-16.2-12. State property.
Notwithstanding any other statutesstatute or regulationsregulation, all state property and structures
thereon shall beon state property are subject to the provisions of this chapter and any ordinances
adopted pursuant tounder this chapter or the national flood insurance program [42 U.S.C. 4001 et seq.].
The appropriate state agency or entity having an interest in state property and state structures shall
notify the department when state property or structures are constructed within a special flood hazard
area designated by the federal emergency management agency.

S. B. NO. 2060 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2060.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 2 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State